Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,194
Reverse bungee jumping rides; prohibited.

No person shall operate a reverse bungee jumping ride in this state.

Laws 1994, LB 608, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1804.01;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 30.